Utah statutes.
76-9-509.   Conveying false or libelous material to newspaper or broadcasting stations.

Any person who willfully states, conveys, delivers, or transmits, by any means whatsoever, to the manager, editor, publisher, reporter, or agent of any radio station, television station, newspaper, magazine, periodical, or serial for publication therein, any false or libelous statement concerning any person, and thereby secures actual publication of the same, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

